Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) Every person who sells, furnishes, administers, distributes, gives away, or offers to sell, furnish, administer, distribute, or give away a device, canister, tank, or receptacle either exclusively containing nitrous oxide or flavored nitrous oxide or exclusively containing a chemical compound mixed with nitrous oxide, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.(2) This section does not apply to any person who administers nitrous oxide for the purpose of providing medical, veterinary, or dental care, if administered by a medical, veterinary, or dental practitioner licensed by this state or at the direction or under the supervision of a practitioner licensed by the state.(3) This section does not apply to the sale of nitrous oxide contained in food products for use as a propellant.(4) This section does not apply to the sale and use of nitrous oxide by a manufacturer as part of a manufacturing process or industrial operation.(5) This section does not apply to the filling of cylinders of nitrous oxide for the subsequent sale, furnishment, or distribution of nitrous oxide by a person or entity engaged in lawfully distributing medical, veterinary, dental, food-grade, industrial, or automotive gases, when the nitrous oxide is sold, furnished, or distributed solely for a purpose exempt under this section, provided that the cylinders are not for personal use.(6) This section does not apply to the sale and use of nitrous oxide for automotive purposes.(7) As used in this section, "nitrous oxide" refers to any of the following substances: N20, dinitrogen monoxide, dinitrogen oxide, nitrogen oxide, or laughing gas.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.--- END ---